Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1503
Deer covered by program.

Deer is the
only species of wildlife covered by the program. To be accepted, the entire
field-dressed deer carcass shall be donated, but the hunter may keep the antlers,
head, and cape.

Laws 2012, LB928, § 7.